Tennessee, session 114, SB0128.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-12-112(a)(2)(A), is amended by
deleting "sixty (60)" and substituting "fifty (50)".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0128
001440
- 1 -